Washington statutes.
RCW 36.24.040

Duty of coroner's jury—Oath.

When four or more of the jurors attend, they shall be sworn by the coroner to inquire who the person was, and when, where, and by what means he or she came to his or her death, and into the circumstances attending his or her death, and to render a true verdict therein, according to the evidence afforded them, or arising from the inspection of the body.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4033; 1963 c 4 s 36.24.040. Prior: Code 1881 s 2779; 1863 p 560 s 5; 1854 p 436 s 5; RRS s 4183.]